Alabama, session 2026rs, SB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 36-13-7 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§36-13-7
(a) The Governor is authorized and empowered to may
remove from office and discharge from employment, with or
Page 1

remove from office and discharge from employment, with or
SB38 INTRODUCED
without cause, any person individual who holds office or
employment in any of the state executive departments and or
agencies by virtue of appointment by the incumbent Governor or
any preceding Governor, except those employees subject to the
state Merit System provisions.
(b) The Governor may remove from office and discharge
from employment, with or without cause, any individual who is
serving in the position of executive officer of an
occupational or professional licensing board, except those
individuals subject to the state Merit System."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2